apertium-en-it.it.dix
    <pardef n="vostr/o__det">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>i</l>
	  <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>o</l>
	  <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>a</l>
	  <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/il_vostro__det">
      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>i<b/>vostri</l>
	  <r>il<b/>vostro<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>il<b/>vostro</l>
	  <r>il<b/>vostro<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>le<b/>vostre</l>
	  <r>il<b/>vostro<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>la<b/>vostra</l>
	  <r>il<b/>vostro<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="RL">
	<p>
	  <l><a/>i<b/>vostri</l>
	  <r>il<b/>vostro<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="RL">
	<p>
	  <l><a/>il<b/>vostro</l>
	  <r>il<b/>vostro<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="RL">
	<p>
	  <l><a/>le<b/>vostre</l>
	  <r>il<b/>vostro<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="RL">
	<p>
	  <l><a/>la<b/>vostra</l>
	  <r>il<b/>vostro<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/il_vostro__prn">
      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>i<b/>vostri</l>
	  <r>il<b/>vostro<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>il<b/>vostro</l>
	  <r>il<b/>vostro<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>le<b/>vostre</l>
	  <r>il<b/>vostro<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>la<b/>vostra</l>
	  <r>il<b/>vostro<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="RL">
	<p>
	  <l><a/>i<b/>vostri</l>
	  <r>il<b/>vostro<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="RL">
	<p>
	  <l><a/>il<b/>vostro</l>
	  <r>il<b/>vostro<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="RL">
	<p>
	  <l><a/>le<b/>vostre</l>
	  <r>il<b/>vostro<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="RL">
	<p>
	  <l><a/>la<b/>vostra</l>
	  <r>il<b/>vostro<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/il_loro__det">
      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>i<b/>loro</l>
	  <r>il<b/>loro<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>il<b/>loro</l>
	  <r>il<b/>loro<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>le<b/>loro</l>
	  <r>il<b/>loro<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>la<b/>loro</l>
	  <r>il<b/>loro<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="RL">
	<p>
	  <l><a/>i<b/>loro</l>
	  <r>il<b/>loro<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="RL">
	<p>
	  <l><a/>il<b/>loro</l>
	  <r>il<b/>loro<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="RL">
	<p>
	  <l><a/>le<b/>loro</l>
	  <r>il<b/>loro<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="RL">
	<p>
	  <l><a/>la<b/>loro</l>
	  <r>il<b/>loro<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/il_loro__prn">
      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>i<b/>loro</l>
	  <r>il<b/>loro<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>il<b/>loro</l>
	  <r>il<b/>loro<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>le<b/>loro</l>
	  <r>il<b/>loro<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>la<b/>loro</l>
	  <r>il<b/>loro<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="RL">
	<p>
	  <l><a/>i<b/>loro</l>
	  <r>il<b/>loro<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="RL">
	<p>
	  <l><a/>il<b/>loro</l>
	  <r>il<b/>loro<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="RL">
	<p>
	  <l><a/>le<b/>loro</l>
	  <r>il<b/>loro<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="RL">
	<p>
	  <l><a/>la<b/>loro</l>
	  <r>il<b/>loro<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vuln/us__n">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>era</l>
	  <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>us</l>
	  <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ABC__np">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Polizia__np">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Afghanistan__np">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Europa__np">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="USA__np">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Maldive__np">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="María__np">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Juan__np">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Díez__np">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BBVA__n">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="PIL__n">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="TV__n">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="il loro"><par n="/il_loro__det"/></e>
    <e lm="il vostro"><par n="/il_vostro__det"/></e>
    <e lm="vostro"><i>vostr</i><par n="vostr/o__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ETA"><i>ETA</i><par n="BBVA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Bahrain"><i>Bahrain</i><par n="Afghanistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Bulgaria"><i>Bulgaria</i><par n="Europa__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Calderón"><i>Calderón</i><par n="ABC__np"/></e>
    <e lm="California"><i>California</i><par n="Afghanistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="USA"><i>USA</i><par n="USA__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Stati Uniti"><i>Stati<b/>Uniti</i><par n="USA__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Stati Uniti d'America"><i>Stati<b/>Uniti<b/>d'America</i><par n="USA__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Caraibi"><i>Caraibi</i><par n="USA__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Appalachi"><i>Appalachi</i><par n="USA__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ferrari"><i>Ferrari</i><par n="ABC__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Georgia"><i>Georgia</i><par n="Afghanistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Grecia"><i>Grecia</i><par n="Europa__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Nuovo Testamento"><i>Nuovo<b/>Testamento</i><par n="ABC__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Google Summer of Code"><i>Google<b/>Summer<b/>of<b/>Code</i><par n="ABC__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Malta"><i>Malta</i><par n="Afghanistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Moratinos"><i>Moratinos</i><par n="Díez__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Nature"><i>Nature</i><par n="ABC__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Polizia"><i>Polizia</i><par n="Polizia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Seconda guerra mondiale"><i>Seconda<b/>guerra<b/>mondiale</i><par n="Polizia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Guerra fredda"><i>Guerra<b/>fredda</i><par n="Polizia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Magna Carta"><i>Magna<b/>Carta</i><par n="Polizia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Repsol"><i>Repsol</i><par n="ABC__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Requena"><i>Requena</i><par n="Afghanistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Svizzera"><i>Svizzera</i><par n="Europa__np"/></e>
    <e lm="TVE"><i>TVE</i><par n="ABC__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Villarreal"><i>Villarreal</i><par n="Afghanistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="html"><i>html</i><par n="ABC__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Betsabé"><i>Betsabé</i><par n="María__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Felicitas"><i>Felicitas</i><par n="María__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Nadina"><i>Nadina</i><par n="María__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ursulina"><i>Ursulina</i><par n="María__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Georgine"><i>Georgine</i><par n="María__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Cassidy"><i>Cassidy</i><par n="María__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Mayra"><i>Mayra</i><par n="María__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Thierri"><i>Thierri</i><par n="Juan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ariano"><i>Ariano</i><par n="Juan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Everardo"><i>Everardo</i><par n="Juan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Melquíades"><i>Melquíades</i><par n="Juan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Zenaires"><i>Zenaires</i><par n="Juan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Johnathon"><i>Johnathon</i><par n="Juan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Jean-Bernard"><i>Jean-Bernard</i><par n="Juan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="BBVA"><i>BBVA</i><par n="BBVA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="FMI"><i>FMI</i><par n="BBVA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="PP"><i>PP</i><par n="BBVA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="PSOE"><i>PSOE</i><par n="BBVA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="PNV"><i>PNV</i><par n="BBVA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="PSC"><i>PSC</i><par n="BBVA__n"/></e>
    <e lm="A/H1N1"><i>A/H1N1</i><par n="TV__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="kg"><i>kg</i><par n="PIL__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ONU"><i>ONU</i><par n="TV__n"/></e>
    <e lm="PIL"><i>PIL</i><par n="PIL__n"/></e>
    <e lm="UE"><i>UE</i><par n="TV__n"/></e>
    <e lm="UGT"><i>UGT</i><par n="TV__n"/></e>
    <e lm="UPC"><i>UPC</i><par n="TV__n"/></e>
    <e lm="URL"><i>URL</i><par n="TV__n"/></e>
    <e lm="TV"><i>TV</i><par n="TV__n"/></e>
    <e lm="il loro"><par n="/il_loro__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="il vostro"><par n="/il_vostro__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="Maguire"><i>Maguire</i><par n="Díez__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Gonzalez"><i>Gonzalez</i><par n="Díez__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Michelin"><i>Michelin</i><par n="Díez__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Warhol"><i>Warhol</i><par n="Díez__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Yanukovych"><i>Yanukovych</i><par n="Díez__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Mussolini"><i>Mussolini</i><par n="Díez__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Canarie"><i>Canarie</i><par n="Maldive__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Isole Cayman"><i>Isole<b/>Cayman</i><par n="Maldive__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Isole Sopravento settentrionali"><i>Isole<b/>Sopravento<b/>settentrionali</i><par n="Maldive__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Isole Vergini britanniche"><i>Isole<b/>Vergini<b/>britanniche</i><par n="Maldive__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Isole Cook"><i>Isole<b/>Cook</i><par n="Maldive__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Isole Marchesi"><i>Isole<b/>Marchesi</i><par n="Maldive__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Isola del Nord"><i>Isola<b/>del<b/>Nord</i><par n="Europa__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Sri Lanka"><i>Sri<b/>Lanka</i><par n="Europa__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Azzorre"><i>Azzorre</i><par n="Maldive__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Dakota del Sud"><i>Dakota<b/>del<b/>Sud</i><par n="Europa__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Marsiglia"><i>Marsiglia</i><par n="Europa__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Belgrado"><i>Belgrado</i><par n="Afghanistan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Liechtenstein"><i>Liechtenstein</i><par n="Afghanistan__np"/></e>
